Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3710
Sections, how construed.

Nothing in sections 77-3706, 77-3707, and 77-3708 shall be construed as altering or affecting in any manner, any zoning, planning, building or land-use, laws, ordinances, rules, or regulations.

Laws 1969, c. 516, § 18, p. 2128;

R.S.1943, (1978), § 60-1613;

Laws 1981, LB 168, § 11.